Nebraska, session 109, LB858.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB858 LB858
2026 2026
Section 1. Laws 2025, LB261, section 107, is amended to read:
Sec. 107. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 502 - Public Health Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 7,083,060 7,083,060
CASH FUND 9,339,000 10,230,000
CASH FUND 9,339,000 9,730,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 16,422,060 17,313,060
PROGRAM TOTAL 16,422,060 16,813,060
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,083,060 General Funds and $9,339,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $7,083,060 General Funds and
$10,230,000 $9,730,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $2,100,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $2,100,000 General
Funds for the seven community health centers funded through Federal
Program 330, Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation
Act of 1996. Each of the following centers is to receive $300,000:
Charles Drew Health Center, OneWorld Community Health Centers, East
Central District Health Department — Good Neighbor Community Health
Center, Community Action Partnership of Western Nebraska, Midtown Health
Center, Bluestem Health, and Heartland Health Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $1,400,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $1,400,000 General
Funds for the seven community health centers funded through Federal
Program 330, Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation
Act of 1996 for dental services. Each of the following centers is to
receive $200,000: Charles Drew Health Center, OneWorld Community Health
Centers, East Central District Health Department — Good Neighbor
-2-

LB858 LB858
2026 2026
Community Health Center, Community Action Partnership of Western
Nebraska, Midtown Health Center, Bluestem Health, and Heartland Health
Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $325,000 General Funds and $750,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund and for FY2026-27 $325,000 General Funds
and $750,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the
seven community health centers funded through Federal Program 330, Public
Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996. Each
center is to receive an amount to be distributed proportionally based on
the previous fiscal year's number of uninsured clients as reported on the
Uniform Data System Report provided to the United States Department of
Health and Human Services Bureau of Primary Health Care. The distribution
shall be made to Charles Drew Health Center, OneWorld Community Health
Centers, East Central District Health Department — Good Neighbor
Community Health Center, Community Action Partnership of Western Nebraska
Health Center, Midtown Health Center, Bluestem Health, and Heartland
Health Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
the seven community health centers funded through Federal Program 330,
Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996.
Each center is to receive an amount to be distributed proportionally
based on the number of uninsured clients served in the previous fiscal
year as reported on the Uniform Data System Report provided by the health
centers to the Bureau of Primary Health Care of the Health Resources and
Services Administration of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services. The distribution shall be made to Charles Drew Health
Center, OneWorld Community Health Centers, East Central District Health
Department—Good Neighbor Community Health Center, Community Action
Partnership of Western Nebraska Health Center, Midtown Health Center,
-3-

LB858 LB858
2026 2026
Bluestem Health, and Heartland Health Center. The community health
centers shall use the amount distributed for expanded health care access
through the community health centers, including, but not limited to,
expanding existing lines of service such as behavioral health or dental
services, adding new lines of service, adding new service locations,
purchasing equipment, or completing capital projects. It is the intent of
the Legislature to increase the transfer from the Nebraska Tobacco
Settlement Trust Fund to the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund by $500,000
for FY2026-27 and annually thereafter for the increased aid funding for
the federally qualified health centers.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $300,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $300,000 General Funds
to provide funds to tribally owned, urban-based, federally qualified
health centers designated under the federal Indian Self-Determination and
Education Assistance Act, Public Law 93-638, as such act existed on
January 1, 2025.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
aid to Midtown Health Center to fund expanded health care access through
the community health center, including, but not limited to, expanding
existing lines of service such as behavioral health or dental services,
adding new lines of service and locations, purchasing equipment, or
completing capital projects.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $2,898,246 General Funds and $5,605,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for public health departments. There is
included in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27
$2,898,246 General Funds and $5,605,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for public health departments. There is included in
the amount shown in this section for FY2025-26 $2,898,246 General Funds
and for FY2026-27 $2,898,246 General Funds to be distributed equally
-4-

LB858 LB858
2026 2026
among the eighteen public health departments. There is included in the
amount shown in this section for FY2025-26 $5,405,000 Cash Funds and for
FY2026-27 $5,405,000 Cash Funds to be distributed among the eighteen
public health departments pursuant to section 71-1628.08. There is
included in the amount shown in this section for FY2025-26 $200,000 Cash
Funds and for FY2026-27 $200,000 Cash Funds to be distributed equally
among the eighteen public health departments.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $31,713 General Funds and $1,526,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for minority public health services in
counties having a minority population equal to or exceeding five percent
of the total population of the county in the first and third
congressional districts as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census. There is included in the amount shown as aid for this
program for FY2026-27 $31,713 General Funds and $1,526,000 Cash Funds
from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for minority public health
services in counties having a minority population equal to or exceeding
five percent of the total population of the county in the first and third
congressional districts as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
distribute the funds on a per capita basis for the purpose of
implementing a minority health initiative which may target, but shall not
be limited to, infant mortality, cardiovascular disease, obesity,
diabetes, and asthma.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $28,101 General Funds and $1,349,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be distributed equally to the community
health centers in the second congressional district funded through
Federal Program 330, Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers
Consolidation Act of 1996. Such funds shall be used for the purpose of
implementing a minority health initiative which may target, but shall not
-5-

LB858 LB858
2026 2026
be limited to, infant mortality, cardiovascular disease, obesity,
diabetes, and asthma. There is included in the amount shown as aid for
this program for FY2026-27 $28,101 General Funds and $1,349,000 Cash
Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be distributed equally
to the community health centers in the second congressional district
funded through Federal Program 330, Public Law 104-299, the federal
Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996. Such funds shall be used for
the purpose of implementing a minority health initiative which may
target, but shall not be limited to, infant mortality, cardiovascular
disease, obesity, diabetes, and asthma.
Sec. 2. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 107, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-